District of Columbia statutes.
27-101

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Fraud” shall have the same meaning as that term is used in § 22-3221.

(2)

“Juvenile” means a person under 18 years of age.

(3)

“Merchant” means a person who does or would sell, lease, or transfer, either directly or indirectly, consumer goods or services, or a person who does or would supply the goods or services which are or would be the subject matter of a trade practice.

(4)

“Shoplifting” shall have the same meaning as that term has in § 22-3213(a).

(5)

“Theft” shall have the same meaning as that term is used in § 22-3211.

History

May 16, 1992, D.C. Law 9-98, § 2, 39 DCR 678

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-441.

Temporary Legislation

Temporary addition of chapter: D.C. Law 9-97 enacted this chapter.
Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 9-97 provided that the act shall expire on the 225th day of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct of 1991, whichever occurs first.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-110, November 25, 1991, 38 DCR 7304).
For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-155, February 21, 1992, 39 DCR 1354).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-205, May 14, 1992, 39 DCR 3649).

Editor's Notes

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 20-34 as subchapter II of this chapter, the preexisting text, §§ 27-101 through 27-106, has been designated as subchapter I; and “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in the introductory language of this section.